Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-208
Equipment; facilities.

The Governor is hereby authorized to requisition or purchase from the Department of the Army or Department of the Air Force for the use of the armed forces of this state such arms, ammunition, clothing, and equipment as are necessary and authorized by the Department of the Army or Department of the Air Force under regulations; and to make available to such forces the facilities of state armories and their equipment and such other state premises and property as may be available. Where state facilities are not available, grounds, armories, and other buildings may be leased and maintained in the manner provided by law for the Nebraska National Guard.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 4, p. 448;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-404;

Laws 1943, c. 126, § 4, p. 428;

R.S.1943, § 55-208;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 36, p. 607.